California statutes. Penal Code
(d) This section does not prohibit the investigation of any criminal activity in this state that may involve the performance of a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, provided that information relating to any medical procedure performed on a specific individual is not shared with an
 agency or individual from another state for the purpose of enforcing another state’s law involving a legally protected health care activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 679, Sec. 11.   (AB 82)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13778.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meaning:

(1) “Gender-affirming health care” and “gender-affirming mental health care” have the same meaning as in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 16010.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) “Legally protected health care activity” shall have the same meaning as in Section 1549.15.

(3) “Reproductive health care services” shall have the same meaning as in Section 1549.15.

(4) “California corporation”
 refers to any corporation or other entity that is subject to Section 102 of the Corporations Code, with the exception of foreign corporations.

(b) A state or local government employee, person or entity contracted by a state or local government, or person or entity acting on behalf of a local or state government shall not cooperate with or provide information to any individual, including a bondsman or person authorized, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1299.02, to apprehend, detain, or arrest a fugitive admitted to bail in another state, or out-of-state agency or department regarding any legally protected health care activity or otherwise expend or use time, moneys, facilities, property, equipment, personnel, or other resources in furtherance of any investigation or proceeding that seeks to impose civil or criminal liability or
 professional sanctions upon a person or entity for any legally protected health care activity that occurred in this state or that would be legal if it occurred in this state.

(c) This section does not prohibit compliance with a valid, court-issued subpoena, warrant, wiretap order, pen register trap and trace order, or other legal process which does not relate to a law seeking to impose civil or criminal liability or professional sanctions for a legally protected health care activity, or in response to the written request of a person who is the subject of such an investigation or proceeding, to the extent necessary, in each case, to fulfill such request.

(d) Any out-of-state subpoena, warrant, wiretap order, pen register trap and trace order, legal process, or request from any law
 enforcement agent or entity shall include an affidavit or declaration under penalty of perjury that the discovery is not in connection with an out-of-state proceeding relating to any legally protected health care activity unless the out-of-state proceeding meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is based in tort, contract, or on statute.

(2) Is actionable, in an equivalent or similar manner, under the laws of this state.

(3) Was brought by the patient who received a legally protected health care activity or the patient’s legal representative.

(e) A state court, judicial officer, court employee or clerk, or authorized attorney shall not issue a subpoena pursuant
 to any other state’s law unless it includes the affidavit or declaration defined in subdivision (d).

(f) A California corporation that provides electronic communication services or remote computing services to the general public shall not comply with an out-of-state subpoena, warrant, wiretap order, pen register trap and trace order, other legal process, or request by a law enforcement agent or entity seeking records that would reveal the identity of the customers using those services, data stored by, or on behalf of, the customer, the customer’s usage of those services, the recipient or destination of communications sent to or from those customers, or the content of those communications, unless the out-of-state subpoena, warrant, wiretap order, pen register trap and trace order, other legal process, or request from law enforcement
 includes the affidavit or declaration defined in subdivision (d). A corporation subject to this subdivision is entitled to rely on the representations made in the affidavit or declaration.

(g) (1) The Attorney General may commence a civil action against a person or entity that submits a false affidavit in violation of subdivision (d). Any action brought by the Attorney General pursuant to this section shall be commenced within six years of the date on which the Attorney General received notice of the subpoena, warrant, wiretap order, pen register trap and trace order, legal process, or request from any law enforcement agent or entity that the false affidavit accompanied.

(2) A person or entity that submits a false affidavit in violation of subdivision (d)
 shall be punished by a civil penalty of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). This shall be in addition to any other penalties or remedies provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 679, Sec. 12.   (AB 82)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 6. CALIFORNIA COUNCIL ON CRIMINAL JUSTICE [13800. - 13899.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [13800. - 13801.]

13800.

Unless otherwise required by context, as used in this title:

(a) “Agency” means the Office of Emergency Services.

(b) “Board” means the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(c) “Federal acts” means Subchapter V of Chapter 46 of the federal Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3750 et seq.) and any act or acts amendatory or
 supplemental thereto.

(d) “Local boards” means local criminal justice planning boards.

(e) “Executive director” means the Executive Director of the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 50, Sec. 3.   (AB 169)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13801.

Nothing in this title shall be construed as authorizing the board, or the local boards to undertake direct operational criminal justice responsibilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 55.5.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Criminal Justice Planning [13820. - 13825.]

13820.

(a) The Office of Criminal Justice Planning is hereby abolished. The duties and obligations of that office, and all powers and authority formerly exercised by that office, shall be transferred to and assumed by the Office of Emergency Services, with the exception of the duties described in Section 6024, which shall be assumed by the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(b) Except for this section, the phrase “Office of Criminal Justice Planning” or any reference to that phrase in this code shall be construed to mean or refer to the Office of Emergency Services. Any reference to the executive director of the Office of Criminal Justice Planning in this code shall be construed to mean the
 Director of Emergency Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 428.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13821.

(a) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, the Controller shall allocate 9 percent of the amount deposited in the Local Law Enforcement Services Account in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 to the Office of Emergency Services. The Controller shall allocate these funds on a quarterly basis beginning on October 1. These funds shall be allocated by the Controller pursuant to a schedule provided by the Office of Emergency Services that shall be developed according to the office’s existing programmatic guidelines and the following percentages:

(1) The California Multi-Jurisdictional
 Methamphetamine Enforcement Teams shall receive 47.52 percent in the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(2) The Multi-Agency Gang Enforcement Consortium shall receive 0.2 percent in the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(3) The Sexual Assault Felony Enforcement Teams, authorized by Section 13887, shall receive 12.48 percent in the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(4) The High Technology Theft Apprehension and Prosecution Program, authorized by Section 13848.2, shall receive 26.83 percent in the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(5) The Gang Violence Suppression Program authorized by Section 13826.1, shall receive 3.91 percent in the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(6) The Central Valley and Central Coast Rural Crime Prevention Programs, authorized by
 Sections 14170 and 14180, shall receive 9.06 percent in the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(b) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, the Office of Emergency Services may be reimbursed up to five hundred eleven thousand dollars ($511,000) from the funds allocated in subdivision (a) for program administrative costs.

(c) Commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year, subsequent to the allocation described in subdivision (c) of Section 29552 of the Government Code, and commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, subsequent to the allocation described in subdivision (d) of Section 29552 of the Government Code, the Controller shall allocate 8.99758189 percent of the remaining amount deposited in the Enhancing Law Enforcement Activities Subaccount in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 and shall distribute the moneys as follows:

(1) Commencing with the
 2012–13 fiscal year, the California Multi-Jurisdictional Methamphetamine Enforcement Teams shall receive 47.52015636 percent and shall be allocated by the Controller according to the following schedule:Alameda County1.7109%Alpine County0.6327%Amador County0.6327%Butte County1.6666%Calaveras County0.8435%Colusa County0.1623%Contra Costa County1.3163%Del Norte County0.2167%El Dorado County1.3716%Fresno County5.3775%Glenn County0.2130%Humboldt County1.0198%Imperial County2.5510%Inyo County0.6327%Kern County5.6938%Kings County0.9701%Lake County0.6604%Lassen County0.2643%Los Angeles County5.3239%Madera County0.9701%Marin County0.6292%Mariposa County0.6327%Mendocino County0.6846%Merced County1.8136%Modoc County0.0734%Mono County0.6327%Monterey County0.9018%Napa County0.6803%Nevada County0.7482%Orange County1.5661%Placer County2.6395%Plumas County0.1516%Riverside County5.6395%Sacramento County10.0169%San Benito County0.8404%San Bernardino County8.9364%San Diego County2.5510%San Francisco County1.0034%San Joaquin County4.6394%San Luis Obispo County1.3483%San Mateo County1.1224%Santa Barbara County1.3483%Santa Clara County2.0612%Santa Cruz County0.8333%Shasta County1.3426%Sierra County0.0245%Siskiyou County0.3401%Solano County1.8979%Sonoma County1.1610%Stanislaus County3.6272%Sutter County0.7177%Tehama County0.4808%Trinity County0.1044%Tulare County2.5306%Tuolumne County0.6327%Ventura County1.3483%Yolo County1.5215%Yuba County0.5466%(2) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the California Multi-Jurisdictional Methamphetamine Enforcement Teams shall receive 47.52015636 percent and shall be allocated in monthly installments by the Controller according to the following schedule:Alameda County1.7109%Alpine County0.6327%Amador County0.6327%Butte County1.6666%Calaveras County0.8435%Colusa County0.1623%Contra Costa County1.3163%Del Norte County0.2167%El Dorado County1.3716%Fresno County5.3775%Glenn County0.2130%Humboldt County1.0198%Imperial County2.5510%Inyo County0.6327%Kern County5.6938%Kings County0.9701%Lake County0.6604%Lassen County0.2643%Los Angeles County5.3239%Madera County0.9701%Marin County0.6292%Mariposa County0.6327%Mendocino County0.6846%Merced County1.8136%Modoc County0.0734%Mono County0.6327%Monterey County0.9018%Napa County0.6803%Nevada County0.7482%Orange County1.5661%Placer County2.6395%Plumas County0.1516%Riverside County5.6395%Sacramento County10.0169%San Benito County0.8404%San Bernardino County8.9364%San Diego County2.5510%San Francisco County1.0034%San Joaquin County4.6394%San Luis Obispo County1.3483%San Mateo
 County1.1224%Santa Barbara County1.3483%Santa Clara County2.0612%Santa Cruz County0.8333%Shasta County1.3426%Sierra County0.0245%Siskiyou County0.3401%Solano County1.8979%Sonoma
 County1.1610%Stanislaus County3.6272%Sutter County0.7177%Tehama County0.4808%Trinity County0.1044%Tulare County2.5306%Tuolumne County0.6327%Ventura County1.3483%Yolo
 County1.5215%Yuba County0.5466%(3) Commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year, the Multi-Agency Gang Enforcement Consortium shall receive 0.19545566 percent and shall be allocated by the Controller to Fresno County.

(4) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the Multi-Agency Gang Enforcement Consortium shall receive 0.19545566 percent and shall be allocated in monthly installments by the Controller to Fresno County.

(5) Commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year, the Sexual Assault Felony Enforcement Teams, authorized by Section 13887, shall receive 12.48473003 percent and shall be allocated by the Controller according to the following
 schedule:Los Angeles County21.0294%Riverside County12.8778%Sacramento County14.0198%San Luis Obispo County12.0168%Santa Clara County17.0238%Shasta County12.0168%Tulare County11.0156%(6) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the Sexual Assault Felony Enforcement Teams, authorized by Section 13887, shall receive 12.48473003 percent and shall be allocated by the Controller in monthly installments according to the following schedule:Los Angeles County21.0294%Riverside County12.8778%Sacramento County14.0198%San Luis Obispo County12.0168%Santa Clara County17.0238%Shasta County12.0168%Tulare County11.0156%(7) Commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year, the High Technology Theft Apprehension and Prosecution Program, authorized by Section 13848.2, shall receive 26.82628878 percent and shall be allocated by the Controller according to the following schedule:Los Angeles County18.25%Marin County18.25%Marin County, for use by the Department
 of Justice in implementing subdivision (b) of Section 13848.47.00%Marin County, for use by the California District Attorneys Association in implementing subdivision (b) of Section 13848.41.75%Sacramento County18.25%San Diego County18.25%Santa Clara County18.25%(8) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the High Technology Theft Apprehension and Prosecution Program, authorized by Section 13848.2, shall receive 26.82628878 percent and shall be allocated by
 the Controller in monthly installments according to the following schedule:Los Angeles County18.25%Marin County18.25%Marin County, for use by the Department of Justice in implementing subdivision (b) of Section 13848.4 8.75%Sacramento County18.25%San Diego County18.25%Santa Clara County18.25%(9) Commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year, the Gang Violence Suppression Program, authorized by Section 13826.1, shall receive 3.90911312 percent and shall be allocated by the Controller according to the following schedule:Alameda County9.6775%Los Angeles County22.5808%Monterey County9.6775%Napa County17.7417%City of Oxnard17.7417%City of Sacramento22.5808%(10) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the Gang Violence Suppression Program, authorized by Section 13826.1, shall receive 3.90911312 percent and shall be allocated by the Controller in monthly
 installments according to the following schedule:Alameda County9.6775%Los Angeles County22.5808%Monterey County9.6775%Napa County17.7417%City of Oxnard17.7417%City of Sacramento22.5808%(11) Commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year, the Central Valley
 and Central Coast Rural Crime Prevention Programs, authorized by Sections 14170 and 14180, shall receive 9.06425605 percent and shall be allocated by the Controller according to the following schedule:Fresno County18.5588%Kern County13.7173%Kings County6.8587%Madera County4.4380%Merced County6.8587%Monterey County7.2411%San Benito County4.8273%San Joaquin County6.8587%San Luis Obispo County2.1723%Santa Barbara County3.6206%Santa Cruz County1.4482%Stanislaus County6.8587%Tulare County16.5415%(12) Commencing with the 2013–14
 fiscal year, the Central Valley and Central Coast Rural Crime Prevention Programs, authorized by Sections 14170 and 14180, shall receive 9.06425605 percent and shall be allocated by the Controller in monthly installments according to the following schedule:Fresno County18.5588%Kern County13.7173%Kings County6.8587%Madera County4.4380%Merced County6.8587%Monterey County7.2411%San Benito County4.8273%San Joaquin County6.8587%San Luis Obispo County2.1723%Santa Barbara County3.6206%Santa Cruz County1.4482%Stanislaus County6.8587%Tulare County16.5415%(d) For any of the programs described in this section, funding will be distributed by local agencies as would otherwise have occurred pursuant to Section 1 of Chapter 13 of the Statutes of 2011, First Extraordinary Session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 83, Sec. 3.   (SB 157)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.2.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) That violent and serious crimes are being committed against the elderly on an alarmingly regular basis.

(2) That in 1985, the United States Department of Justice reported that approximately 1 in every 10 elderly households in the nation would be touched by crime.

(3) That the California Department of Justice, based upon limited data received from local law enforcement agencies, reported that approximately 10,000 violent crimes were committed against elderly victims in 1985.

(4) That while the elderly may not be the most frequent targets of crime, when they are victimized the impact of each vicious attack has long-lasting effects. Injuries involving, for example, a broken hip may never heal properly and often leave the victim physically impaired. The loss of money used for food and other daily living expenses for these costs may be life-threatening for the older citizen on a fixed income. In addition, stolen or damaged property often cannot be replaced.

(5) Although the State of California currently funds programs to provide assistance to victims of crime and to provide general crime prevention information, there are limited specialized efforts to respond directly to the needs of elderly victims or to provide prevention services tailored for the senior
 population.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that victim services, crime prevention, and criminal justice training programs funded by the Office of Emergency Services shall include, consistent with available resources, specialized components that respond to the diverse needs of elderly citizens residing in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 430.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.3.

The Office of Emergency Services may expend funds for local domestic violence programs, subject to the availability of funds therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 431.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.4.

(a) The Legislature finds the problem of family violence to be of serious and increasing magnitude. The Legislature also finds that acts of family violence often result in other crimes and social problems.

(b) There is in the Office of Emergency Services, a Family Violence Prevention Program. This program shall provide financial and technical assistance to local domestic and family violence centers in implementing family violence prevention programs.

The goals and functions of the program shall include all of the following:

(1) Promotion of community involvement through public education
 geared specifically toward reaching and educating the friends and neighbors of members of violent families.

(2) Development and dissemination of model protocols for the training of criminal justice system personnel in domestic violence intervention and prevention.

(3) Increasing citizen involvement in family violence prevention.

(4) Identification and testing of family violence prevention models.

(5) Replication of successful models, as appropriate, through the state.

(6) Identification and testing of domestic violence model protocols and intervention systems in major service delivery institutions.

(7) Development of informational materials and seminars to enable emulation or adaptation of the models by other communities.

(8) Provision of domestic violence prevention education and skills to students in schools.

(c) The Director of Emergency Services shall allocate funds to local centers meeting the criteria for funding that shall be established by the Office of Emergency Services in consultation with practitioners and experts in the field of family violence prevention. All centers receiving funds pursuant to this section shall have had an ongoing recognized program, supported by either public or private funds, dealing with an aspect of family violence, for at least two years prior to the date specified for submission of
 applications for funding pursuant to this section. All centers funded pursuant to this section shall utilize volunteers to the greatest extent possible.

The centers may seek, receive, and make use of any funds which may be available from all public and private sources to augment any state funds received pursuant to this section. Sixty percent of the state funds received pursuant to this section shall be used to develop and implement model program protocols and materials. Forty percent of the state funds received pursuant to this section shall be allocated to programs to disseminate model program protocols and materials. Dissemination shall include training for domestic violence agencies in California. Each of the programs funded under this section shall focus on no more than two targeted areas. These targeted model areas shall be determined by the Office of
 Emergency Services in consultation with practitioners and experts in the field of domestic violence, using the domestic violence model priorities survey of the California Alliance Against Domestic Violence.

Centers receiving funding shall provide matching funds of at least 10 percent of the funds received pursuant to this section.

(d) The Office of Emergency Services shall develop and disseminate throughout the state information and materials concerning family violence prevention, including, but not limited to, a procedures manual on prevention models. The Office of Emergency Services shall also establish a resource center for the collection, retention, and distribution of educational materials related to family violence and its prevention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 432.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.5.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services, with the assistance of the advisory committee established pursuant to Section 13836, shall establish a protocol for the examination and treatment of victims of sexual assault and attempted sexual assault, including child sexual abuse, and the collection and preservation of evidence therefrom. The protocol shall contain recommended methods for meeting the standards specified in Section 13823.11.

(b) (1) In addition to the protocol, the Office of Emergency Services shall develop informational guidelines, containing general reference information on evidence collection and examination of, and psychological and medical treatment for,
 victims of sexual assault and attempted sexual assault, including child sexual abuse.

(2) In developing the protocol and the informational guidelines, the Office of Emergency Services and the advisory committee shall seek the assistance and guidance of organizations assisting victims of sexual assault; qualified health care professionals, sexual assault forensic examiners, criminalists, and administrators who are familiar with emergency room procedures; victims of sexual assault; and law enforcement officials.

(c) (1) The Office of Emergency Services, in cooperation with the State Department of Public Health and the Department of Justice, shall adopt a standard and a complete form or forms for the recording of medical and physical evidence data disclosed by a
 victim of sexual assault or attempted sexual assault, including child sexual abuse. The form may be issued as a paper version, as an electronic version, or as both the paper and electronic versions. Electronic forms may include links to the California Victim Compensation Board to help patients apply for victim compensation.

(2) Each qualified health care professional who conducts an examination for evidence of a sexual assault or an attempted sexual assault, including child sexual abuse, shall use the standard form or forms adopted pursuant to this section, and shall make those observations and perform those tests as may be required for recording of the data required by the form. The forms shall be subject to the same principles of confidentiality applicable to other medical records.

(3) The Office of Emergency Services shall make the standard form or forms available to every public or private general acute care hospital, as requested.

(4) The standard form shall be used to satisfy the reporting requirements specified in Sections 11160 and 11161 in cases of sexual assault, and may be used in lieu of the form specified in Section 11168 for reports of child abuse.

(d) The Office of Emergency Services shall distribute copies of the protocol and the informational guidelines to every general acute care hospital, law enforcement agency, and prosecutor’s office in the state.

(e) For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Qualified health care professional” means any of the following:

(A) A physician and surgeon currently licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) A nurse, nurse practitioner, or certified nurse-midwife currently licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code and working in consultation with a physician and surgeon currently licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(C) A physician assistant
 currently licensed pursuant to Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code and working in consultation with a physician and surgeon currently licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) “Sexual assault forensic examiner” or “SAFE” means a qualified health care professional who has been trained on the standardized sexual assault forensic medical curriculum specified in this section and Sections
 13823.6 to 13823.11, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   (AB 2730)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.6.

The Office of Emergency Services may secure grants, donations, or other funding for the purpose of funding any statewide task force on sexual assault of children that may be established and administered by the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 434.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.7.

The protocol adopted pursuant to Section 13823.5 for the medical treatment of victims of sexual assault, which includes the examination and treatment of victims of sexual assault or attempted sexual assault, including child sexual abuse, and the collection and preservation of evidence therefrom shall include provisions for all of the following:

(a) Notification of injuries and a report of suspected child sexual abuse to law enforcement authorities.

(b) Obtaining consent for the examination, for the treatment of injuries, for the collection of evidence, and for the photographing of injuries.

(c) Taking a patient history of sexual assault and other relevant medical history.

(d) Performance of the physical examination for evidence of sexual assault.

(e) Collection of physical evidence of assault.

(f) Collection of other medical specimens.

(g) Procedures for the preservation and disposition of physical evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 714, Sec. 4.   (AB 538)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.9.

(a) Every public or private general acute care hospital, clinic, or other emergency medical facility that examines a victim of sexual assault or attempted sexual assault, including child sexual abuse, shall comply with the standards specified in Section 13823.11 and the protocol and guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 13823.5.

(b) Each county with a population of more than 100,000 shall arrange that professional personnel trained in the examination of victims of sexual assault, including child sexual abuse, shall be present or on call either in the county hospital which provides emergency medical services or in any general acute care hospital which has contracted with the county
 to provide emergency medical services. In counties with a population of 1,000,000 or more, the presence of these professional personnel shall be arranged in at least one general acute care hospital for each 1,000,000 persons in the county.

(c) Each county shall designate at least one general acute care hospital to perform examinations on victims of sexual assault, including child sexual abuse.

(d) (1) The protocol published by the Office of Emergency Services shall be used as a guide for the procedures to be used by every public or private general acute care hospital in the state for the examination and treatment of victims of sexual assault and attempted sexual assault, including child sexual abuse, and the collection and preservation of evidence
 therefrom.

(2) The informational guide developed by the Office of Emergency Services shall be consulted where indicated in the protocol, as well as to gain knowledge about all aspects of examination and treatment of victims of sexual assault and child
 sexual abuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (AB 538)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.93.

(a) For purposes of this section, to “perform a medical evidentiary examination” means to evaluate, collect, preserve, and document evidence, interpret findings, and document examination results as described in Sections 13823.5 to 13823.11, inclusive.

(b) (1) To ensure the delivery of standardized curriculum, essential for consistent examination procedures throughout the state, one hospital-based training center shall be identified as the California Clinical Forensic Medical Training Center and established through a competitive bidding process, to train qualified health care professionals on how to perform medical evidentiary examinations for victims of child
 abuse or neglect, child sexual abuse, intimate partner violence, sexual assault, sex trafficking, domestic violence, elder or dependent adult abuse, and abuse or assault perpetrated against persons with disabilities. The center also shall provide training for investigative and court personnel involved in dependency and criminal proceedings, on how to interpret the findings of medical evidentiary examinations.

(2) The training provided by the training center shall be made available to qualified health care professionals, law enforcement, and the courts throughout the state.

(c) The training center shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Recognized expertise and experience in providing medical evidentiary examinations
 for victims of child abuse or neglect, child sexual abuse, intimate partner violence, sexual assault, sex trafficking, domestic violence, elder or dependent adult abuse, and abuse or assault perpetrated against persons with disabilities.

(2) Recognized expertise and experience implementing the protocol established pursuant to Section 13823.5.

(3) History of providing training, including, but not limited to, the clinical supervision of trainees and the evaluation of clinical competency.

(4) Recognized expertise and experience in the use of advanced medical technology and training in the evaluation of victims of child abuse or neglect, child sexual abuse, intimate partner violence, sexual assault, sex trafficking, domestic
 violence, elder or dependent adult abuse, and abuse or assault perpetrated against persons with disabilities.

(5) Significant history in working with professionals in the field of criminalistics.

(6) Established relationships with local crime laboratories, clinical laboratories, law enforcement agencies, district attorneys’ offices, child protective services, victim advocacy programs, and federal investigative agencies.

(7) The capacity for developing a telecommunication network between primary, secondary, and tertiary medical providers.

(8) History of leadership in working collaboratively with forensic medical experts, criminal justice experts, investigative
 social worker experts, state criminal justice, social services, health and mental health agencies, and statewide professional associations representing the various disciplines, especially those specified in paragraph (8) of subdivision (d).

(9) History of leadership of and capability for developing and providing training and technical assistance for sexual assault forensic examination teams, and recognition of the nexus between the sexual assault forensic examination teams and completion of the mandated medical evidentiary examination forms.

(10) History of working collaboratively with state and local victim advocacy organizations, especially those addressing sexual assault and domestic violence.

(11) History and experience in the development and delivery of standardized curriculum for forensic medical experts, criminal justice professionals, and investigative social workers.

(12) History of research, particularly involving databases, in the area of child abuse and neglect, child sexual abuse, intimate partner violence, sexual assault, sex trafficking, elder or dependent adult abuse, abuse or assault perpetrated against persons with disabilities, or domestic violence.

(d) The training center shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop
 and implement a standardized training program for qualified health care professionals that has been reviewed and approved by a multidisciplinary peer review committee.

(2) Develop and maintain updated standardized medical evidentiary examination forms, both paper and electronic, develop and maintain protocols for examination of child abuse and neglect, child sexual abuse, intimate partner violence, sexual assault, sex trafficking, domestic violence, elder or dependent adult abuse, or abuse or assault perpetrated against persons with disabilities, including supplemental forms and protocols for medical evaluation of strangulation injuries for all types of interpersonal
 violence.

(3) Advance the field with scientific evidence-based curriculum through standardized form development and data analysis for compliance, quality assurance, and curriculum development.

(4) Develop a telecommunication system network between the training center and other areas of the state, including rural and midsized counties. This service shall provide case consultation to qualified health care professionals, law enforcement, and the courts and provide continuing medical education.

(5) Provide ongoing basic, advanced, and specialized training programs for qualified health care professionals on child abuse
 and neglect, child sexual abuse, intimate partner violence, sexual assault, sex trafficking, domestic violence, elder or dependent adult abuse, and abuse or assault perpetrated against persons with disabilities, including training on best practices for all abused patients, including patients who suffer from strangulation injuries.

(6) Develop guidelines for the reporting and management of child abuse and neglect, child sexual abuse, intimate partner violence, domestic violence, sexual assault, sex trafficking, elder or dependent adult abuse, and abuse or assault perpetrated against persons with disabilities.

(7) Provide training and technical assistance for sexual assault forensic examination teams on the science of medical evidentiary examinations, emerging trends, and sound operational practices, and conduct annual training needs assessments for sexual assault forensic examination teams.

(8) Develop recommended guidelines for evaluating the results of training for qualified health care professionals performing examinations.

(9) Provide standardized training for law enforcement officers, district attorneys, public defenders, investigative social workers, and judges on medical evidentiary examination procedures and the interpretation of findings. This training shall be developed and implemented in collaboration with the
 Peace Officer Standards and Training Program, the California District Attorneys Association, the California Peace Officers Association, the California Police Chiefs Association, the California State Sheriffs’ Association, the California Association of Crime Laboratory Directors, the California Sexual Assault Investigators Association, the California Alliance Against Domestic Violence, the Statewide California Coalition for Battered Women, the Family Violence Prevention Fund, child victim advocacy organizations, the California Welfare Directors Association, the California Coalition Against Sexual Assault, the Department of Justice, the agency, the Child Welfare Training Program, and the University of California extension programs.

(10) Promote an interdisciplinary approach in the assessment and management of child abuse
 and neglect, child sexual abuse, intimate partner violence, sexual assault, sex trafficking, domestic violence, elder or dependent adult abuse, and abuse or assault against persons with disabilities.

(11) Provide training in the dynamics of victimization, including, but not limited to, rape trauma syndrome, intimate partner battering and its effects, the effects of child abuse and neglect, the effects of child sexual abuse, and the various aspects of elder abuse. This training shall be provided by individuals who are recognized as experts within their respective disciplines.

(12) Provide training on the use of the standardized sexual assault forensic examination kit.

(13) Provide continuing education through publications, including, but not limited to, training videos, webinars, and telecommunications.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to change the scope of practice for any health care provider, as defined in other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 714, Sec. 6.   (AB 538)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.95.

(a) Costs incurred by a qualified health care professional, hospital, clinic, sexual assault forensic examination team, or other emergency medical facility for a medical evidentiary examination of a victim of a sexual assault, as described in the protocol developed pursuant to Section 13823.5, when the examination is performed pursuant to Sections 13823.5 and 13823.7, shall not be charged directly or indirectly to the victim of the assault.
